Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB181.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1630 of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended to read:Section 1630. Residual Funds.--(a) In the event that a candidate or political committee terminates its financial activity as such, then the disbursement of any residual funds remaining in such an account shall be made in the following manner:12345678910111213141516171819202122 (1) any such funds may be used for any expenditure as defined by this article; [and](2) may be returned, pro rata, to the contributors by the candidate or treasurer of the political committee[. A final report must be made by the next January 31 in accordance with section 1627.]; or(3) may be donated to a nonprofit organization.(b) A final report must be made by the next January 31 in accordance with section 1627.(c) For purposes of this section:(1) "Affiliated" means serving as an officer of, on the board of directors of, as a paid employee of or as a contractor of a nonprofit organization.(2) "Family member" means a spouse or child.(3) "Nonprofit organization" means an organization that is qualified by the Internal Revenue Service as meeting the requirements of 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.) organized under the laws of this Commonwealth and is not affiliated with a candidate or the chairman or treasurer of a political committee, including a family member of the candidate, chairman or treasurer.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0181PN0119 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223